Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2390.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6559SV (1) 91 jda/jh S.F. 2390 Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0t. Be subject to and comply with the 3 requirements of section 280.16B relating to the development and 4 implementation of a cardiac emergency response plan in the same 5 manner as a school district. 6 Sec. 2. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 7 by adding the following new paragraph: 8 NEW PARAGRAPH . v. Be subject to and comply with the 9 requirements of section 280.16B relating to the development and 10 implementation of a cardiac emergency response plan in the same 11 manner as a school district. 12 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 280.16B School health-related 13 emergency response plan competitive grant program. 14 1. As used in this section: 15 a. âAthletic emergency action planâ means written guidelines 16 and templates for the documentation of emergency planning to 17 help prepare individuals for a catastrophic injury situation 18 that occurs during physical education or an extracurricular 19 athletic activity or contest. 20 b. âAutomated external defibrillatorâ means a lightweight, 21 portable device that delivers an electric shock through the 22 chest to the heart to stop an irregular heartbeat and allow 23 normal heartbeat rhythm to resume following cardiac arrest. 24 c. âCardiac emergency response planâ means a written 25 document that satisfies all of the following requirements: 26 (1) Establishes the specific steps to be taken by employees 27 or contractors of a school to respond to incidents involving 28 an individual experiencing cardiac arrest or a similar 29 life-threatening emergency on school property, during physical 30 education, during an extracurricular athletic activity or 31 contest, during practice associated with an extracurricular 32 athletic activity or contest, or during a school-sponsored 33 activity, and to reduce the likelihood of the individualâs 34 death from cardiac arrest or a similar life-threatening 35 -1- LSB 6559SV (1) 91 jda/jh 1/ 5 S.F. 2390 emergency. 1 (2) Integrates core elements of guidance adopted by the 2 American heart association. 3 d. âSchoolâ means all of the following: 4 (1) A school district organized pursuant to chapter 274. 5 (2) An accredited nonpublic school. 6 (3) A charter school established pursuant to chapter 256E. 7 (4) A charter school or innovation zone school established 8 pursuant to chapter 256F. 9 2. If the general assembly appropriates moneys to the 10 school health-related emergency response plan competitive 11 grant program fund established pursuant to subsection 5, 12 the department of education shall develop and administer a 13 school health-related emergency response plan competitive 14 grant program to provide grants to schools to offset the costs 15 associated with the schoolâs development and implementation of 16 a cardiac emergency response plan that satisfies all of the 17 following requirements: 18 a. Establishes a cardiac emergency response team and 19 activates the team in response to an individual experiencing 20 cardiac arrest or a similar life-threatening emergency 21 on school property, during physical education, during an 22 extracurricular athletic activity or contest, during practice 23 associated with an extracurricular athletic activity or 24 contest, or during a school-sponsored activity. 25 b. Requires the placement of automated external 26 defibrillators on school property pursuant to guidance adopted 27 by the American heart association and in such a manner that all 28 of the following requirements are satisfied: 29 (1) An employee or contractor of a school is able to place 30 an automated external defibrillator on an individual on school 31 property within three minutes after the individual experiences 32 cardiac arrest. 33 (2) Each automated external defibrillator is available in 34 an unlocked location on school property that is accessible 35 -2- LSB 6559SV (1) 91 jda/jh 2/ 5 S.F. 2390 during the school day and during any extracurricular 1 athletic activity or contest, practice associated with 2 an extracurricular athletic activity or contest, or 3 school-sponsored activity. 4 (3) Each automated external defibrillator is identified 5 using appropriate signage. 6 c. Requires routine maintenance of automated external 7 defibrillators on school property according to the 8 manufacturerâs operational guidelines. 9 d. Requires the school to provide information to emergency 10 medical services providers related to the schoolâs automated 11 external defibrillators, including the type of automated 12 external defibrillator placed on school property and the 13 location of each automated external defibrillator placed on 14 school property. 15 e. Requires the distribution of the cardiac emergency 16 response plan to all attendance centers within the school 17 system. 18 f. Requires ongoing training and certification for coaches, 19 school nurses, athletic trainers, and, when appropriate, other 20 employees or contractors, in first aid, the administration 21 of cardiopulmonary resuscitation, and the use of automated 22 external defibrillators. 23 g. Requires annual drills to practice the execution of the 24 cardiac emergency response plan. 25 h. Requires that local emergency medical services providers 26 be contacted in the event an individual experiences cardiac 27 arrest or a similar life-threatening emergency on school 28 property, during physical education, during an extracurricular 29 athletic activity or contest, during practice associated with 30 an extracurricular athletic activity or contest, or during a 31 school-sponsored activity. 32 i. Requires ongoing review and evaluation of the cardiac 33 emergency response plan on at least an annual basis. 34 j. Includes an athletic emergency action plan. 35 -3- LSB 6559SV (1) 91 jda/jh 3/ 5 S.F. 2390 3. The state board of education shall adopt rules 1 pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this section, including 2 rules relating to grant application materials, eligibility 3 requirements, and award criteria. 4 4. Moneys awarded under this section shall be used to 5 supplement, not supplant, existing public funding used by a 6 school district for similar purposes. 7 5. A school health-related emergency response plan 8 competitive grant program fund is established in the state 9 treasury under the control of the department of education. All 10 moneys deposited or paid into the fund are appropriated to 11 the department of education to be used for grants awarded as 12 provided under this section. Notwithstanding section 8.33, 13 moneys in the fund that remain unencumbered or unobligated 14 at the close of a fiscal year shall not revert but shall 15 remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated. 16 Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or 17 earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. 18 Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to school years 19 beginning on or after July 1, 2027. 20